North Dakota, session 69, HB1202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. FLEXIBLE TRANSPORTATION FUND - EXEMPTION - GRANT - ONE-TIME
FUNDING. Notwithstanding the designations and requirements under section 24-02-37.3 and
within the limits of legislative appropriations, the director of the department of transportation
shall use $3,000,000 from the flexible transportation fund to distribute a grant to a county
impacted by a state supreme court case related to a drainage project, during the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The grant funding may be used only for
costs associated with a drainage project, including litigation expenses, inflationary costs, and
other project costs. The grant funding distributed in this section is considered a one-time
funding item.
Page No. 1 25.0933.01000